Utah statutes.
20A-3-404.   Special military write-in absentee ballots.

(1)  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a military voter may apply for a special write-in absentee ballot not later than the date 20 days before the date of an election.

(2)  To qualify for a special write-in absentee ballot, a military voter shall:

(a)  apply for a special write-in absentee ballot by submitting a federal postcard application form; and

(b)  state on the form or on a separate paper submitted with the form that he is unable to vote by regular absentee ballot or in person because of his military service.

(3)  Upon receipt of the application, the county clerk shall issue and mail a special military write-in ballot.

